apertium-id-ms.id.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="ISO-8859-1"?>

<dictionary> 
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHILMNOPRSTUWYJKVXZabcdefghilmnoprstuwyjkvxz</alphabet>

  <!-- Symbol definitions -->
  <xi:include xmlns:xi="http://www.w3.org/2001/XInclude" href="apertium-id-ms.symbols.xml"/>

  <!-- Paradigm definitions -->
  <pardefs>
    <!-- Pronouns -->

    <!-- Prepositions -->
    <pardef n="ke__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <!-- Adjectives -->
    <pardef n="lanjut__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Nouns -->
    <pardef n="tombol__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 
    <!-- Verbs -->
    <pardef n="klik__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adverbs -->
    <pardef n="silakan__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

  <!-- Main dictionary section -->
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <e lm="tombol"><i>tombol</i><par n="tombol__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tahap"><i>tahap</i><par n="tombol__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kamus"><i>kamus</i><par n="tombol__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sepeda"><i>sepeda</i><par n="tombol__n"/></e>

    <e lm="ke"><i>ke</i><par n="ke__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="untuk"><i>untuk</i><par n="ke__pr"/></e>

    <e lm="lanjut"><i>lanjut</i><par n="lanjut__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="berikutnya"><i>berikutnya</i><par n="lanjut__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="silakan"><i>silakan</i><par n="silakan__adv"/></e>


    <e lm="klik"><i>klik</i><par n="klik__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="meneruskan"><i>meneruskan</i><par n="klik__vblex"/></e>
  </section>

</dictionary>
